Arkansas, session 2025, HB1160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-7-202(23), concerning the definition of
“gap year” as applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, is
amended to read as follows:
(23) “Gap year” "Gap period" means a period of time one-quarter
(1/4) of a fiscal year:
(A) In which a member:
(i) Was an inactive member; and
(ii) Either:
(a) Was unemployed; or
(b) Did not provide qualified service; and
(B) For which the system may grant the member permissive
service credit;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-7-613 is amended to read as follows:
*LJH002*
01/16/2025 9:46:59 AM LJH002

HB1160
24-7-613. Permissive service credit — Gap year period service.
(a) A member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may purchase
permissive service credit for one (1) or more gap years periods if the
member:
(1) The member:
(A) Has five (5) years of actual service in the system;
(B)(2) Has left his or her position as a classroom teacher
immediately before each nonconsecutive gap year gap period or the initial gap
year gap period of consecutive gap years gap periods;
(C)(3) Returns to his or her position as a classroom teacher
after one (1) or more gap years gap periods;
(D)(4) Accrues at least one-half (½) year of service credit
after returning to his or her position as a classroom teacher;
(E)(5) Was inactive during the gap year gap period or gap years
gap periods; and
(F)(6) Is ineligible to receive free service credit for each gap
year gap period under another provision of the law applicable to the system;
and
(2) Each gap year amounts to an entire fiscal year.
(b)(1) A member may purchase one (1) one-quarter (1/4) year of
permissive service credit for each one (1) gap year gap period.
(2) A member shall not purchase more than five (5) years of
permissive service credit.
(c) Permissive service credit for one (1) or more gap years periods
shall not be purchasable after a member retires from the system.
(d) Permissive service credit shall be credited in accordance with §
24-7-601.
(e)(1) The member shall pay the actuarial equivalent of the member's
benefits to the system for each one-quarter (1/4) year of permissive service
credit purchased.
(2) A year Each one-quarter (1/4) year of permissive service
credit that is being purchased by a member shall not become credited service
under the system until the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits is
paid in full.
(f) At the member's request, a member's payment for permissive service
credit under this section shall be refunded if the:
01/16/2025 9:46:59 AM LJH002

HB1160
(1) Member ceases to be an active member before the permissive
service credit is established as credited service in the system; or
(2) Permissive service credit is not otherwise used to establish
the member's eligibility for retirement under the system.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state
public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the
General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq., need immediate revision and updating to
address administrative complexities caused by these provisions and to bring
these provisions into conformance with sound public pension policy and
actuarial requirements; that the revisions and updates are of great
importance to members and covered employers of the Arkansas Teacher
Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that as the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to
June 30, a July 1, 2025, effective date is necessary in order to allow the
provisions within this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and
to allow for a structured and proper administration of the procedures
referenced in this act; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance and necessary for
protecting member benefits and clarifying the reporting and contribution
requirements of employers participating in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system
of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary
for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become
effective on July 1, 2025.







01/16/2025 9:46:59 AM LJH002